Maryland, session 2025, SB0102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
19–602.
(a) In this section, “public entity” means:
(1) a political subdivision of the State;
(2) a unit of the State or a local government; [or]
(3) a nonprofit or nonstock corporation that:
(i) receives 50% or more of its annual operating budget from the
State or a local government; and
(ii) is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal
Revenue Code; OR
(4) A RESILIENCE AUTHORITY AS DEFINED IN § 22–101 OF THE
– 1 –

Ch. 350 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(b) Public entities may pool together to purchase casualty insurance, property
insurance, or health insurance or to self–insure against casualty, property, or health risks.
Article – Local Government
22–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Resilience Authority” means an authority incorporated by one or more local
governments in accordance with this title whose purpose is to undertake or support
resilience infrastructure projects.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –